Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska17-209
Appointed officers and employees; compensation; fixed by ordinance.

The appointive officials and other employees of the village shall receive such compensation as the chairman and board of trustees shall designate by ordinance; and the annual salary of the chairman and other members of the board of trustees shall be fixed by ordinance.

Laws 1879, § 48, p. 204;

Laws 1885, c. 18, § 1, p. 159;

R.S.1913, § 5059;

C.S.1922, § 4231;

C.S.1929, § 17-209;

Laws 1935, c. 36, § 4, p. 149;

Laws 1937, c. 32, § 1, p. 157;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 17-209;

Laws 1943, c. 30, § 3, p. 140;

R.S.1943, § 17-209;

Laws 1945, c. 26, § 1, p. 137;

Laws 1947, c. 31, § 2(1), p. 141;

Laws 1949, c. 21, § 2, p. 92;

Laws 1961, c. 49, § 1, p. 190;

Laws 1969, c. 89, § 2, p. 452.